Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Department" means the department of commerce.(2) "Resident" means any person who resides in senior independent housing.(3) "Senior independent housing" means any residential housing that is advertised, maintained, designed, or constructed for the express or implied purpose of providing housing for persons 55 years of age or older who are independent and do not require assistance with activities of daily living. Senior independent housing is typically designed to enable seniors to live on their own, but with the security and convenience of community living, including recreational, educational, and social activities. "Senior independent housing" does not include facilities that provide medical care or assistance with activities of daily living, such as assisted living facilities, nursing homes, long-term care facilities, or other similar living arrangements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) In addition to any other rights provided by law, senior independent housing residents have the rights provided in this section. The rights provided in this section are minimum rights guaranteed to all residents and are not intended to diminish any other rights provided in local, state, or federal laws.(2) A senior independent housing resident has the right to:(a) Be free of interference, coercion, discrimination, and reprisal from the senior independent housing provider in exercising the resident's rights;(b) Be treated respectfully by management, employees, and staff of the senior independent housing provider;(c) Install safety and security devices, including cameras, at the entrance to the resident's individual living unit or within the unit;(d) Organize, attend, and hold meetings open to any and all residents at reasonable hours and times;(e) Communicate with and receive a timely response from the manager of the senior independent housing provider or the manager's designee at any time of day, including after hours and on weekends, in case of emergencies; and(f) Provide anonymous suggestions and feedback to the management, employees, and staff of the senior independent housing provider through methods such as suggestion boxes in common areas.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The legislature finds that the practices covered by section 2 of this act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 2 of this act by a senior independent housing provider is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.--- END ---